Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 2

Congressional Districts

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1840, § 6, provided:

“If any provision of section 2, 3, 4 or 5 of this act is held invalid by any court of competent jurisdiction, sections 2 through 5 of this act shall be void and Arkansas Code 7-2-102 through 7-2-105 shall be repealed and the congressional districts of this state shall be as follows:

“(1)

The First Congressional District shall be composed of the counties of: Arkansas; Baxter; Clay; Cleburne; Craighead; Crittenden; Cross; Fulton; Greene; Independence; Izard; Jackson; Lawrence; Lee; Lonoke; Mississippi; Monroe; Phillips; Prairie; Poinsett; Randolph; St. Francis; Searcy; Sharp; Stone; and Woodruff; and the qualified electors residing therein shall elect one (1) member of the House of Representatives of the United States;

“(2)

The Second Congressional District shall be composed of the counties of: Conway; Faulkner; Perry; precincts 20, 24, 56, and 57 of Pope County; Pulaski; Saline; Van Buren; White; and Yell; and the qualified electors residing therein shall elect one (1) member of the House of Representatives of the United States;

“(3)

The Third Congressional District shall be composed of the following counties or parts of counties: Benton; Boone; Carroll; Crawford; Franklin (except precincts 20, 23, 24, 26, and 28); Johnson; Madison; Marion; Newton; Pope(except precincts 20, 24, 56, and 57); Sebastian; and Washington; and the qualified electors residing therein shall elect one (1) member of the House of Representatives of the United States; and

“(4)

The Fourth Congressional District shall be composed of the following counties or parts of counties: Ashley; Bradley; Calhoun; Chicot; Clark; Cleveland; Columbia; Dallas; Desha; Drew; precincts 20, 23, 24, 26, and 28 of Franklin County; Garland; Grant; Hempstead; Hot Spring; Howard; Jefferson; Lafayette; Little River; Lincoln; Logan; Miller; Montgomery; Nevada; Ouachita; Pike; Polk; Scott; Sevier; and Union; and the qualified electors residing therein shall elect one (1) member of the House of Representatives of the United States.”

7-2-101. Number of congressional districts.

The State of Arkansas is hereby divided into four (4) congressional districts, provided that the members of the United States House of Representatives presently serving from each of the existing congressional districts of this state shall continue to serve until the expiration of their current terms, and successor congressmen shall be elected from the congressional districts as established in this subchapter. It is the intention of this subchapter to provide for congressional districts of substantially equal population in order to comply with the Equal Protection Clause of the Fourteenth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1220, § 1; 2001, No. 1840, § 1.

7-2-102. First Congressional District.

(a)

The First Congressional District shall be composed of:

(1)

The counties of Arkansas, Baxter, Chicot, Clay, Cleburne, Craighead, Crittenden, Cross, Desha, Fulton, Greene, Independence, Izard, Jackson, Lawrence, Lee, Lincoln, Lonoke, Mississippi, Monroe, Phillips, Prairie, Poinsett, Randolph, St. Francis, Sharp, Stone, and Woodruff;

(2)

The following voting districts of Jefferson County as they existed on January 1, 2011:

(A)

19 (Dunnington) voting district;

(B)

P15 (Dudley Lake) voting district;

(C)

25 (Old River) voting district;

(D)

57 (Villemont) voting district;

(E)

P91 (Roberts) voting district;

(F)

P851 (Humphrey) voting district; and

(G)

P862 (Humphrey) voting district; and

(3)

The voting districts and voting precincts of Searcy County as they existed on January 1, 2011, that are not listed under §7-2-104(a)(4).

(b)

The qualified electors residing in the counties and portion of Jefferson County and Searcy County listed under subsection (a) of this section shall elect one (1) member of the United States House of Representatives.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1220, § 2; 2001, No. 1840, § 2; 2011, No. 1241, § 1; 2011, No. 1242, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment by identical acts Nos. 1241 and 1242, in present (a)(1), inserted “Chicot,” “Desha,” and “Lincoln,” and deleted “Searcy” following ”St. Francis”; inserted (a)(2) and (a)(3); and rewrote and redesignated present (b).

7-2-103. Second Congressional District.

(a)

The Second Congressional District shall be composed of the counties of Conway, Faulkner, Perry, Pulaski, Saline, Van Buren, and White.

(b)

The qualified electors residing in the counties listed under subsection (a) of this section shall elect one (1) member of the United States House of Representatives.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1220, § 3; 2001, No. 1840, § 3; 2011, No. 1241, § 1; 2011, No. 1242, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment by identical acts Nos. 1241 and 1242 deleted “and Yell” following “White” in present (a)(1); and substituted “in the counties listed under subsection (a) of this section” for “therein” in present (b).

7-2-104. Third Congressional District.

(a)

The Third Congressional District shall be composed of:

(1)

The counties of Benton, Boone, Carroll, Marion, Pope, and Washington;

(2)

The voting districts and voting precincts of Crawford County as they existed on January 1, 2011, that are not listed under §7-2-105(a)(2);

(3)

The following voting districts of Newton County as they existed on January 1, 2011:

(A)

Big Creek voting district;

(B)

Dogpatch voting district;

(C)

Grove voting district;

(D)

Hasty voting district;

(E)

Polk voting district;

(F)

Richland voting district; and

(G)

White voting district;

(4)

The Prairie voting district of Searcy County as it existed on January 1, 2011; and

(5)

The voting districts and voting precincts of Sebastian County as they existed on January 1, 2011, that are not listed under §7-2-105(a)(5).

(b)

The qualified electors residing in the counties and portions of Crawford County, Newton County, Searcy County, and Sebastian County listed under subsection (a) of this section shall elect one (1) member of the United States House of Representatives.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1220, § 4; 2001, No. 1840, § 4; 2011, No. 1241, § 1; 2011, No. 1242, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment by identical acts Nos. 1241 and 1242, in present (a)(1), deleted “Crawford, Franklin, Johnson, Madison” following “Carroll,” deleted “Newton” following “Marion,” and deleted “Sebastian” following “Pope”; inserted (a)(2) through (a)(5); and rewrote and redesignated present (b).

7-2-105. Fourth Congressional District.

(a)

The Fourth Congressional District shall be composed of:

(1)

The counties of Ashley, Bradley, Calhoun, Clark, Cleveland, Columbia, Dallas, Drew, Franklin, Garland, Grant, Hempstead, Hot Spring, Howard, Johnson, Lafayette, Little River, Logan, Madison, Miller, Montgomery, Nevada, Ouachita, Pike, Polk, Scott, Sevier, Union, and Yell;

(2)

The following voting districts of Crawford County as they existed on January 1, 2011:

(A)

Alma # 1 voting district;

(B)

Alma # 4 voting district;

(C)

Bidville voting district;

(D)

Chester voting district;

(E)

Dean Springs voting district;

(F)

Dyer voting district;

(G)

Eagle Crest voting district;

(H)

Kibler voting district;

(I)

Locke voting district;

(J)

Mountain voting district;

(K)

Mulberry # 1 voting district;

(L)

Mulberry # 2 voting district;

(M)

Mulberry # 3 voting district;

(N)

Porter voting district;

(O)

Vine Prairie voting district;

(P)

Whitley voting district; and

(Q)

Winfrey voting district;

(3)

The voting districts and voting precincts of Jefferson County as they existed on January 1, 2011, that are not listed under §7-2-102(a)(2);

(4)

The voting districts and voting precincts of Newton County as they existed on January 1, 2011, that are not listed under §7-2-104(a)(3); and

(5)

The following voting districts of Sebastian County as they existed on January 1, 2011:

(A)

9-1-A voting district;

(B)

9-1-B voting district;

(C)

9-1-C voting district;

(D)

9-1-D voting district;

(E)

9-1-E voting district;

(F)

9-1-Q voting district;

(G)

9-2-E voting district;

(H)

9-3-E voting district;

(I)

9-3-F voting district;

(J)

9-3-G voting district;

(K)

9-3-H voting district;

(L)

9-3-I voting district;

(M)

9-3-J voting district;

(N)

9-3-K voting district;

(O)

9-3-L voting district; and

(P)

9-3-M voting district.

(b)

The qualified electors residing in the counties and portions of Crawford County, Jefferson County, Newton County, and Sebastian County listed under subsection (a) of this section shall elect one (1) member of the United States House of Representatives.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1220, § 5; 2001, No. 1840, § 5; 2011, No. 1241, § 1; 2011, No. 1242, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment by identical acts Nos. 1241 and 1242, in present (a)(1), deleted “Chicot” following “Calhoun,” deleted “Desha” following “Dallas,” deleted “Jefferson” following “Howard,” deleted “Lincoln” following “Little River,” and inserted “Franklin,” “Johnson,” “Madison,” and “and Yell”; inserted (a)(2) through (a)(5); and rewrote and redesignated present (b).